Utah statutes.
4-5-3.   Unlawful acts specified.

(1)  A person may not:

(a)  manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale a food that is adulterated or misbranded;

(b)  adulterate or misbrand food;

(c)  except as provided in Subsection (2), distribute, in commerce, a consumer commodity inconsistent with the packaging and labeling requirements of this chapter, or the rules made under this chapter;

(d)  sell, deliver for sale, hold for sale, or offer for sale an article in violation of Section 4-5-9;

(e)  disseminate false advertising;

(f)  remove or dispose of detained or embargoed food in violation of Section 4-5-5;

(g)  adulterate, mutilate, destroy, obliterate, or remove the food label which results in the food being misbranded or adulterated while the food is for sale;

(h)  forge, counterfeit, simulate, or misrepresent a label or information, by the unauthorized use of a mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device;

(i)  use or reveal a method, process, or information which is protected as a trade secret;

(j)  operate a food establishment without a valid registration issued by the department; and

(k)  refuse entry to an authorized agent of the department in a food establishment as required under Section 4-5-18.

(2)  Subsection (1)(c) does not apply to a person engaged in the wholesale or retail distribution of consumer commodities unless that person:

(a)  is engaged in the packaging or labeling of consumer commodities; or

(b)  prescribes or specifies the manner in which consumer commodities are packaged or labeled.



Amended by Chapter 358, 2004 General Session

